Louisiana, session 2026, SB280.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2150.1(25) and (26) and 2156.5 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§2150.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *.
(25) "Environmental well or hole" is a specialized boring that includes
but is not limited to observation, monitor, piezometer, recovery, horizontal
boring, cathodic protection, or geotechnical boreholes for the purposes of
environmental assessment, sampling, or analyzation.
(26) "Water well drilling" means drilling for the purposes of extracting
ground water which includes but is not limited to the drilling, construction,
maintenance, repair, abandoning, plugging, or sealing water wells for potable
and nonpotable water.
* * *
§2156.5. Water well drilling
A. Any person who advertises, solicits, undertakes, attempts, offers, or
submits a price, bid, quote, or estimate to construct, supervise, direct, oversee,
or perform any construction, modification, repair, or maintenance of any
portion of any water well, or environmental well or hole for which the project
value is one dollar or more shall hold the appropriate license and classification.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 280 ENROLLED
B. A water well contractor and environmental well or hole contractor
shall pass the appropriate examination, be registered with the State Licensing
Board for Contractors, be in good standing with the Department of
Conservation and Energy, and meet all other licensure requirements of a
contractor pursuant to this Chapter.
C. A water well contractor and environmental well or hole contractor
shall complete five hours of continuing education annually from a provider
approved by the board and maintain well registration with the Department of
Conservation and Energy pursuant to R.S. 38:3097.3.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.